New Jersey, session 222, A4970.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  As used in this act: Board means the Board of Public Utilities. Department means the Department of Environmental Protection. Nuclear reactor means an apparatus required to be licensed by the United States Nuclear Regulatory Commission that is designed or used to sustain nuclear fission in a self-supporting chain reaction. b.  No later than nine months after the effective date of this act, the board and the department shall assess and inventory every location in the State that has been previously sited for the development and operation of a nuclear reactor. c.  No later than three months after completing the inventory required pursuant to subsection b. of this section, the board and department shall solicit private contracts by public advertisement and bidding to develop nuclear reactor facilities at the locations identified by the board and department pursuant to subsection b. of this section. d.    Notwithstanding the provisions of any law, rule, or regulation to the contrary, all State agencies and local government units shall give the highest priority to the review and approval of any permits that impact the development or operation of a nuclear reactor in the State. 2.    The board and department shall, in accordance with the "Administrative Procedure Act," P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.), adopt rules and regulations as necessary to implement this act. 3. This act shall take effect immediately.